Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.080

Facilitating information exchange.

(1) The commission shall provide for facilitating the exchange of information to administer and implement the provisions of this compact in accordance with the rules of the commission, consistent with generally accepted data protection principles.

(2) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to alter, limit, or inhibit the power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of its licensee information or alter, limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations governing licensee information in the member state.

[ 2024 c 317 s 9.]